Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 5. Commercial Driver’s License Act.

§ 63-1-201.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the Commercial Driver’s License Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-202.
Statement of intent and purpose.

The purpose of this article is to implement the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 (49 USCS Appx. Section 2701 et seq.), hereinafter referred to as “CMVSA,” and thereby prevent the loss to the State of Mississippi of substantial federal highway funds as a penalty for failure to comply therewith.

This article is a remedial law which should be liberally construed to promote public health, safety and welfare. The provisions of Article 1 of this chapter, being the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938, and the provisions of Title 63, Chapter 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, being the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, including penalties for violations thereof, shall be applicable to the provisions of this article to the extent that such laws do not conflict with the provisions of this article. If any provisions of this article conflict with the provisions of the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938 or the Mississippi Implied Consent Law, then the provisions of this article shall control.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-203.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Alcohol” means any substance containing any form of alcohol including, but not limited to, ethanol, methanol, propanol and isopropanol.

“Alcohol concentration” means the concentration of alcohol in a person’s blood or breath. When expressed as a percentage it means:

The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood; or

The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath.

“Commercial driver’s license” or “CDL” means a license issued by a state or other jurisdiction, in accordance with the standards contained in 49 CFR, Part 383, to an individual which authorizes the individual to operate a class of commercial motor vehicle.

“Commercial driver’s license information system” or “CDLIS” means the CDLIS established by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration (FMCSA) pursuant to Section 12007, of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986.

“Commercial learner’s permit” means a permit issued pursuant to Section 63-1-208(5).

“Commercial motor vehicle” or “CMV” means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property if the motor vehicle:

Has a gross combination weight rating of eleven thousand seven hundred ninety-four (11,794) kilograms or more (twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit(s) with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than four thousand five hundred thirty-six (4,536) kilograms (ten thousand (10,000) pounds);

Has a gross vehicle weight rating of eleven thousand seven hundred ninety-four (11,794) or more kilograms (twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more);

Is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver;

Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous materials as defined in this section; or

The term shall not include:

1. Authorized emergency vehicles as defined in Section 63-3-103;

2. Motor homes as defined in Section 63-3-103; however, this exemption shall only apply to vehicles used strictly for recreational, noncommercial purposes;

3. Military and commercial equipment owned or operated by the United States Department of Defense, including the National Guard and Mississippi Military Department, and operated by: active duty military personnel; members of the military reserves; members of the National Guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time National Guard duty; personnel on part-time National Guard training; National Guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms); employees of the Mississippi Military Department; and active duty United States Coast Guard personnel. This exception is not applicable to United States Reserve technicians;

4. Farm vehicles, which are vehicles:

a. Controlled and operated by a farmer;

b. Used to transport either agricultural products, farm machinery, farm supplies, or both, to or from a farm;

c. Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor carrier; and

d. Used within one hundred fifty (150) miles of the farm.

“Controlled substance” means any substance so classified under Section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act, 21 USCS 802(6), and includes all substances listed on Schedules I through V of 21 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 1308, as they may be revised from time to time, any substance so classified under Sections 41-29-113 through 41-29-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, and any other substance which would impair a person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle.

“Conviction” means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination by a judge or hearing officer that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended or probated. Conviction shall also mean a plea of guilty or nolo contendere which has been accepted by the court.

“Disqualification” means any of the following three (3) actions:

The suspension, revocation or cancellation of a commercial driver’s license by the state or jurisdiction of issuance;

Any withdrawal of a person’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle by a state or other jurisdiction as the result of a violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking, vehicle weight or vehicle defect violations; or

A determination by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration that a person is not qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle under 49 CFR, Part 391.

“Driver” means any person who drives, operates or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle on a public highway or who is required to hold a commercial driver’s license.

“Employer” means any person, including the United States, a state, the District of Columbia or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle or assigns employees to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

“Foreign” means outside the fifty (50) United States and the District of Columbia.

“Gross combination weight rating” or “GCWR” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination (articulated) vehicle. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, gross combination weight rating will be determined by adding the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and any load thereon.

“Gross vehicle weight rating” or “GVWR” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single vehicle.

“Hazardous materials” means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 USCS Section 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 CFR, Part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 CFR, Part 73.

“Imminent hazard” means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment.

“Nonresident commercial driver’s license” or “nonresident CDL” means a commercial driver’s license issued by a state to an individual under either of the following two (2) conditions:

To an individual domiciled in a foreign country meeting the requirements of 49 CFR, Part 383.23(b)(1); or

To an individual domiciled in another state meeting the requirements of 49 CFR, Part 383.23(b)(2).

“Serious traffic violation” means conviction at any time when operating a commercial motor vehicle or at those times when operating a noncommercial motor vehicle when the conviction results in the revocation, cancellation, or suspension of the operator’s license or operating privilege, of:

Excessive speeding, involving a single charge of any speed fifteen (15) miles per hour or more, above the posted speed limit;

Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;

Improper traffic lane changes, as defined in Section 63-3-601, 63-3-603, 63-3-613 or 63-3-803;

Following the vehicle ahead too closely, as defined in Section 63-3-619;

A violation of any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a commercial driver’s license;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial driver’s license in the driver’s possession;

Operating a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of commercial driver’s license or endorsements, or both.

“Out-of-service order” means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local jurisdiction, that a driver, or a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor carrier operation, is out of service pursuant to 49 CFR, Part 386.72, 392.5, 395.13, 396.9 or compatible laws, or the North American Uniform Out-of-Service Criteria.

“State of domicile” means that state where a person has a true, fixed and permanent home and principal residence and to which the person has the intention of returning whenever the person is absent.

“Tank vehicle” means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank that is either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. Such vehicles include, but are not limited to, cargo tanks and portable tanks, as defined in 49 CFR, Part 171. However, they do not include portable tanks having a rated capacity under one thousand (1,000) gallons.

“United States” means the fifty (50) states and the District of Columbia.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009; Laws, 2019, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-1-204.
Limitation on number of driver’s licenses.

No person who drives a commercial motor vehicle shall have more than one (1) driver’s license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-205.
Notification required by driver.

The driver of a commercial motor vehicle shall notify the state and employers of convictions as follows:

The state. — Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a driver’s license issued by this state who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in any other state or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal laws of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the commissioner in the manner specified by the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

Employers. — Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a driver’s license issued by this state who is convicted of violating any state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control in this or any other state or federal, provincial, territorial, or municipal laws of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the driver’s employer in writing of the conviction within thirty (30) days of the date of conviction.

Notification of suspensions, revocations and cancellations.— A driver whose driver’s license is suspended, revoked, or cancelled by any state, who loses the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period, or who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period, shall notify the driver’s employer of that fact before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of that fact.

Notification of previous employment. — Any person who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver must provide the employer, at the time of the application, with the following information for the ten (10) years preceding the date of application:

A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

The dates between which the applicant drove for each employer; and

The reason for leaving that employer.

The applicant must certify that all information furnished is true and complete. An employer may require an applicant to provide additional information.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-206.
Employer responsibilities.

Each employer shall require the applicant to provide the information specified in Section 63-3-205(c).

No employer may knowingly allow, require, permit or authorize a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in the United States:

During any period in which the driver has a CMV driver’s license suspended, revoked, or cancelled by a state or has lost the privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle in a state, or has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

During any period in which the driver has more than one (1) CMV driver’s license;

During any period in which the driver, or the CMV the driver is driving, or the motor carrier operation, is subject to an out-of-service order; or

In violation of a federal, state or local law or regulation pertaining to railroad-highway grade crossings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-207.
Commercial driver’s license required.

Except when driving under a commercial learner’s permit and accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the vehicle being driven, no person may drive a commercial motor vehicle on the highways of this state unless the person:

Holds a commercial driver’s license;

Is in immediate possession of the license; and

The license has the applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle the person is driving.

No person may be found to have committed a violation of subsection (1) of this section if the person provides proof to the court having jurisdiction of the traffic complaint that the individual held a commercial driver’s license valid for the vehicle the person was driving on the date the complaint was issued.

No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle while the person’s driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or cancelled, while subject to a disqualification.

No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle in violation of an out-of-service order.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, employees of farm-related service industries shall be exempt from the knowledge and skills tests required under this article, and shall be issued restricted commercial driver’s licenses as long as the applicants meet the requirements of 49 CFR, Part 383, as amended from time to time, and upon payment of the appropriate fee.

“Farm-related service industries” shall include farm retail outlets and suppliers, agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters, and livestock feeders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-208.
Commercial driver’s license qualification standards.

Except as otherwise provided, the commissioner shall not issue a commercial driver’s license and commercial learner’s permit to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years.

No person may be issued a commercial driver’s license unless that person is domiciled in this state and has passed a knowledge and skills test for driving a commercial motor vehicle which complies with minimum federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49 CFR, Part 383, subparts F, G and H and has satisfied all other requirements of Title XII of Public Law 99-570 in addition to other requirements imposed by state law or federal regulation. The tests shall be prescribed and conducted by the commissioner. If the applicant wishes to have a hazardous materials endorsement, the written test for a hazardous materials endorsement must be taken and passed. In addition, the applicant must successfully complete the security threat assessment required by 49 CFR, Part 1572.

The commissioner may authorize a person, including an agency of this or another state, an employer, a private driver training facility, or other private institution, or a department, agency or instrumentality of local government, to administer the skills test specified by this section, provided:

The test is the same as would otherwise be administered by the state; and

The third party has entered into an agreement with this state which complies with requirements of 49 CFR, Part 383.75.

A skills test may be waived as follows:

The commissioner, by rules adopted pursuant to the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, shall provide for a waiver of the skills test specified in this section for a commercial driver’s license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 CFR, Part 383.77;

The rules may establish deadlines by which applicants must claim entitlement and qualification to skills test waivers and may provide for the scheduling of group knowledge testing;

The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this subsection (4) as soon as practicable after July 1, 2017, but in any case no later than July 1, 2018.

A commercial learner’s permit shall be issued as follows:

A commercial learner’s permit may be issued to an individual who holds a valid Mississippi driver’s license who has passed the vision and written tests required for the class of license authorizing the operation of the type of vehicle for which the permit application is being made;

The commercial learner’s permit shall be issued for a period of six (6) months for the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43. Only one (1) renewal or reissuance may be granted within a two-year period. The holder of a commercial learner’s permit may, unless otherwise disqualified, drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by the holder of a commercial driver’s license valid for the type of vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.

A commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit may not be issued to a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or while the person’s driver’s license is suspended, revoked or cancelled in any state. A driver’s license may not be issued to a person who has a commercial driver’s license issued by any state unless the person first surrenders all driver’s licenses issued by any state, which licenses shall be returned to the issuing states for cancellation.

A person shall be entitled to take the test for a commercial driver’s license unless the person’s driver’s license is, at the time of the requested test, suspended, revoked, cancelled or disqualified in any other state.

Notwithstanding any requirement imposed by state law or state or federal regulations restricting the issuance of a commercial driver’s license to a person suffering from diabetes, a person suffering from diabetes may be issued a commercial driver’s license if the person otherwise meets all qualifications for issuance provided:

The driver is physically examined every year, including an examination by a board-certified/eligible endocrinologist attesting to the fact that the driver is:

Free of insulin reactions (an individual is free of insulin reactions if that individual does not have severe hypoglycemia or hypoglycemia unawareness, and has less than one (1) documented, symptomatic hypoglycemic reaction per month);

Able to and has demonstrated willingness to properly monitor and manage the person’s diabetes; and

Not likely to suffer any diminution in driving ability due to the person’s diabetic condition.

The driver agrees to and complies with the following conditions:

A source of rapidly absorbable glucose shall be carried at all times while driving;

Blood glucose levels shall be self-monitored one (1) hour prior to driving and at least once every four (4) hours while driving or on duty prior to driving using a portable glucose monitoring device equipped with a computerized memory;

Submit blood glucose logs to the endocrinologist or medical examiner at the annual examination or when otherwise directed by the Department of Public Safety;

Provide a copy of the endocrinologist’s report to the medical examiner at the time of the annual medical examination; and

Provide a copy of the annual medical certification to the person’s employer for retention in the driver’s qualification file and retain a copy of the certification on his person while driving for presentation to a duly authorized federal, state or local enforcement official.

The commercial license issued under this subsection (8) will bear an endorsement restricting commercial driving on the license to driving only within the boundaries of Mississippi.

The fees for all licenses, permits, renewals and endorsements shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 8; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 353, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 63-1-209.
Nonresident commercial driver’s license.

The commissioner may issue a nonresident commercial driver’s license to a person domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction if the United States Secretary of Transportation has determined that the commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in the foreign jurisdiction do not meet the testing standards established in 49 CFR, Part 383. In addition, the commissioner may issue a nonresident commercial driver’s license to a person domiciled in a state while that state is prohibited from issuing commercial driver’s licenses in accordance with 49 CFR, Part 384.405. The word “nonresident” must appear on the face of the nonresident commercial driver’s license. An applicant shall surrender any nonresident commercial driver’s license issued by another state. Prior to issuing a nonresident commercial driver’s license, the commissioner shall establish the practical capability of revoking or suspending the nonresident commercial driver’s license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-210.
Application for commercial driver’s license.

The application for a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit shall include the following:

The full name and current mailing and residential addresses of the person.

A physical description of the person, including sex, height and weight.

Date of birth.

The applicant’s social security number.

The person’s signature.

Certifications that:

For an applicant who operates or expects to operate in interstate or foreign commerce or who is otherwise subject to 49 CFR, Part 391, the applicant meets the qualification requirements contained in Part 391; or for an applicant who operates or expects to operate entirely in intrastate commerce and who is not subject to Part 391, that the applicant is subject to state driver qualification requirements and is not subject to Part 391;

The motor vehicle in which the applicant’s skills test will be taken is representative of the type of motor vehicle that the applicant operates or expects to operate;

The applicant is not subject to any disqualification under 49 CFR, Part 385.51, or any license suspension, revocation, or cancellation under state law; and

The applicant does not have a driver’s license from more than one (1) state or jurisdiction.

Any other information required by the commissioner, including, but not limited to, the names of all states or jurisdictions where the applicant has been licensed to operate any type of motor vehicle during the previous ten (10) years.

The application shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

When a licensee or permittee changes his or her name, mailing address, or residence or in the case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a license or permit, the licensee or permittee shall notify the commissioner within sixty (60) days and apply in person for a duplicate license or permit in the same manner as set forth in subsection (1) of this section. The fee for a duplicate license or permit shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

A person who has been a resident of this state for more than thirty (30) days shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle under the authority of a commercial driver’s license issued by another jurisdiction.

Any person who knowingly falsifies information or certifications required under subsection (1) of this section shall have the person’s commercial driver’s license revoked. Such persons may reapply for a commercial driver’s license no sooner than sixty (60) days after the revocation.

Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for or renews a commercial driver’s license or renewal of a commercial learner’s permit under this article shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Appx. 451 et seq., as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System. The applicant’s submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration. The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required. The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 10; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 17, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-211.
Commercial driver’s license.

Contents of license. —A commercial driver’s license shall be marked “commercial driver’s license” or “CDL,” and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The name and residential address of the person.

The person’s color photograph or imaged likeness.

A physical description of the person including sex, height, and weight.

Date of birth.

Any number or identifier deemed appropriate by the commissioner.

The person’s signature.

The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles which the person is authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions.

The name of this state.

The dates between which the license is valid.

Classifications, endorsements and restrictions. —Driver’s licenses may be issued with the following classifications, endorsements, and restrictions:

Classifications. —Licensees may drive all vehicles in the class for which the license is issued and all lesser classes of vehicles, except those requiring special endorsements.

1. Vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver; and

2. Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials as defined in Section 63-1-203.

Class A – Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more, provided the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds.

Class B – Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more, and any such vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds.

Class C – Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds:

Class D – Class D licenses are not commercial driver’s licenses and shall be governed by the provisions of Section 63-1-5.

Licenses may be issued with appropriate endorsements and restrictions noted thereon. The commissioner shall determine the manner of notation. Endorsements and restrictions may include, but are not limited to, those which:

Authorize a driver to drive a vehicle transporting hazardous materials;

Restrict the driver to vehicles not equipped with air brakes when the person either fails the air brake component of the knowledge test or performs the skills test in a vehicle not equipped with air brakes;

Authorize driving motorcycles that are not autocycles as defined in Section 63-3-103;

Authorize driving tank vehicles;

Authorize driving vehicles carrying passengers;

Authorize driving school buses;

Authorize driving double trailers;

Restrict the driver to operation solely within this state. A commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit with this restriction may be issued to any person who has attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

Before issuing a commercial driver’s license, the commissioner shall request the applicant’s complete operating record from any state in which the applicant was previously licensed to operate any type of motor vehicle in the past ten (10) years, conduct a check of the applicant’s operating record by querying the national driver register, established under 49 USCS Section 30302, and the Commercial Driver’s License Information System, established under 49 USCS Section 31309, to determine if:

The applicant has already been issued a commercial driver’s license; and the applicant’s commercial driver’s license has been suspended, revoked, or canceled;

The applicant had been convicted of any offenses contained in Section 205(a) (3) of the National Driver Register Act of 1982 (23 USCS Section 401 note).

Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the commissioner shall notify the Commercial Driver License Information System of that fact, providing all information required to ensure identification of the person.

The commercial driver’s license shall expire in the manner set forth in Section 63-1-47.

When applying for renewal of a commercial driver’s license, the applicant shall complete the application form required by Section 63-1-210, providing updated information and required certifications. If the applicant wishes to retain a hazardous materials endorsement, the written test for a hazardous materials endorsement must be taken and passed. In addition, the applicant must successfully complete the security threat assessment required by 49 CFR, Part 1572. If notice is received from the United States Transportation Security Administration that the applicant poses a security risk, the commissioner shall refuse to issue, or revoke within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the notice, a hazardous materials endorsement.

The department shall provide a means for electronic transmission of a medical card and may charge a vendor convenience fee in an amount not to exceed Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50) per transmission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 11; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 18; Laws, 2014, ch. 508, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 406, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-1-212.
Records; notification.

After suspending, revoking, or disqualifying a person from holding a commercial driver’s license, the commissioner shall update the person’s records to reflect that action within ten (10) days. After suspending, revoking or disqualifying a nonresident commercial driver’s privileges, the commissioner shall notify the licensing authority of the state which issued the commercial driver’s license or commercial driver certificate within ten (10) days, including in the notice both the disqualification period and the reason for the disqualification.

Upon receipt from another jurisdiction of the prior record of an applicant for a commercial driver’s license or a commercial learner’s permit, the commissioner shall incorporate the prior record into the applicant’s driver record and, in the case of adverse information, promptly implement any disqualification, licensing limitations, denials, and penalties that are required under 49 CFR, Part 384, that have not been applied by those jurisdictions where the applicant was previously licensed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-213.
Notification of traffic convictions.

When any person operating a commercial motor vehicle or who holds a commercial driver’s license issued by another state is convicted in this state of any violation of state law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, the commissioner shall notify the driver licensing authority in the licensing state of the conviction within ten (10) days of the date of conviction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-214.
Agreements.

The commissioner may enter into or make agreements, arrangements or declarations to carry out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-215.
Reciprocity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this state if the person has a valid commercial driver’s license issued by:

Any state of the United States;

Any province or territory of Canada in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of commercial motor vehicle driver’s licenses; or

The Licensia Federal de Conductor issued by the Republic of Mexico, if the person’s license is not suspended, revoked, or canceled and if the person is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle and is not in violation of an out-of-service order.

The commissioner shall give all out-of-state convictions full faith and credit and treat them for sanctioning purposes under this article as if they occurred in this state.

The commissioner shall record disqualifications and convictions received from other jurisdictions regarding Mississippi operators.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2009.